Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB15.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 337.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workplace Standards under the
direction and supervision of the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(b) "Department" means the Department of Workplace Standards in the Education and Labor Cabinet;
(c) 1. "Wages" includes any compensation due to an employee by reason of his or her employment,
including salaries, commissions, vested vacation pay, overtime pay, severance or dismissal pay,
earned bonuses, and any other similar advantages agreed upon by the employer and the employee
or provided to employees as an established policy. The wages shall be payable in legal tender of
the United States, checks on banks, direct deposits, or payroll card accounts convertible into cash
on demand at full face value, subject to the allowances made in this chapter. However, an
employee may not be charged an activation fee and the payroll card account shall provide the
employee with the ability, without charge, to make at least one (1) withdrawal per pay period for
any amount up to and including the full account balance.
2. For the purposes of calculating hourly wage rates for scheduled overtime for professional
firefighters, as defined in KRS 95A.210(8), "wages" shall not include the distribution to qualified
professional firefighters by local governments of supplements received from the Firefighters
Foundation Program Fund. For the purposes of calculating hourly wage rates for unscheduled
overtime for professional firefighters, as defined in KRS 95A.210(9), "wages" shall include the
distribution to qualified professional firefighters by local governments of supplements received
from the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund;
(d) "Employer" is any person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency, or firm who employs an
employee and includes any person, either individual, corporation, partnership, agency, or firm acting
directly or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee; and
(e) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for an employer, except that:
1. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United States Department of
Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee nor a franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an
employee of the franchisor for any purpose under this chapter; and
2. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United States Department of
Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor nor a franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an
employee of the franchisee for any purpose under this chapter.
For purposes of this paragraph, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same meanings as in 16 C.F.R.
sec. 436.1.
(2) As used in KRS 337.275 to 337.325, 337.345, and 337.385 to 337.405, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Employee" is any person employed by or suffered or permitted to work for an employer, but shall not
include:
1. Any individual employed in agriculture;
2. Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, supervisory, or professional
capacity, or in the capacity of outside salesman, or as an outside collector as the terms are
defined by administrative regulations of the commissioner;
3. Any individual employed by the United States;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. Any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private home. The provisions of this
section shall include individuals employed in domestic service in or about the home of an
employer where there is more than one (1) domestic servant regularly employed;
5. Any individual classified and given a certificate by the commissioner showing a status of learner,
apprentice, worker with a disability, sheltered workshop employee, and student under
administrative procedures and administrative regulations prescribed and promulgated by the
commissioner. This certificate shall authorize employment at the wages, less than the established
fixed minimum fair wage rates, and for the period of time fixed by the commissioner and stated
in the certificate issued to the person;
6. Employees of retail stores, service industries, hotels, motels, and restaurant operations whose
average annual gross volume of sales made for business done is less than ninety-five thousand
dollars ($95,000) for the five (5) preceding years exclusive of excise taxes at the retail level or if
the employee is the parent, spouse, child, or other member of his or her employer's immediate
family;
7. Any individual employed as a baby-sitter in an employer's home, or an individual employed as a
companion by a sick, convalescing, or elderly person or by the person's immediate family, to
care for that sick, convalescing, or elderly person and whose principal duties do not include
housekeeping;
8. Any individual engaged in the delivery of newspapers to the consumer;
9. Any individual subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 7, 16, 27A, 30A, and 18A provided
that the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall have the authority to prescribe by administrative
regulation those emergency employees, or others, who shall receive overtime pay rates necessary
for the efficient operation of government and the protection of affected employees;
10. Any employee employed by an establishment which is an organized nonprofit camp, religious, or
nonprofit educational conference center, if it does not operate for more than two hundred ten
(210) days in any calendar year;
11. Any employee whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour residential care on the
employer's premises in a parental role to children who are primarily dependent, neglected, and
abused and who are in the care of private, nonprofit childcaring facilities licensed by the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services under KRS 199.640 to 199.670;
12. Any individual whose function is to provide twenty-four (24) hour residential care in his or her
own home as a family caregiver, family home provider, or adult foster care provider and who is
approved to provide family caregiver services to an adult with a disability through a contractual
relationship with a community board for mental health or individuals with an intellectual
disability established under KRS 210.370 to 210.460 or through a contractual relationship with a
certified waiver provider as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), or is certified or licensed by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to provide adult foster care;
13. A direct seller as defined in Section 3508(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;[ or]
14. Any individual whose function is to provide behavior support services, behavior programming
services, case management services, community living support services, positive behavior
support services, or respite services through a contractual relationship with a certified waiver
provider, as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(5), pursuant to a 1915(c) home and community
based services waiver program, as defined in 907 KAR 7:005 sec. 1(2); or
15. Any individual employed to play baseball who is compensated pursuant to the terms of a
contract and a collective bargaining agreement that expressly provides for wages and working
conditions;
(b) "Agriculture" means farming in all its branches, including cultivation and tillage of the soil; dairying;
production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural or horticultural commodity; raising
of livestock, bees, furbearing animals, or poultry; and any practice, including any forestry or lumbering
operations, performed on a farm in conjunction with farming operations, including preparation and
delivery of produce to storage, to market, or to carriers for transportation to market;

CHAPTER 22 3
(c) "Gratuity" means voluntary monetary contribution received by an employee from a guest, patron, or
customer for services rendered;
(d) "Tipped employee" means any employee engaged in an occupation in which he or she customarily and
regularly receives more than thirty dollars ($30) per month in tips; and
(e) "U.S.C." means the United States Code.
Section 2. Whereas spring training has already begun for employees contracted to play baseball in 2025,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor March 17, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version